Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.170

Inspection of livestock, hides, records.

The director may enter at any reasonable time any slaughterhouse or public livestock market to inspect livestock or hides, and may enter at any reasonable time an establishment where hides are held to inspect them for brands or other means of identification. The director may enter any of these premises at any reasonable time to examine all books and records required by law in matters relating to livestock identification. For purposes of this section, "any reasonable time" means during regular business hours or during any working shift.

[ 2003 c 326 s 20; 1959 c 54 s 17.]